North Carolina, session 2025, SB89.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-12 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(50) Duty to Adopt Rules for Automatic External Defibrillators (AEDs). – The
State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the installation, use, and
maintenance of AEDs in public school units. At a minimum, the rules shall
include provisions for the following:
a. Installation and placement of at least two AEDs in each school in a
public school unit, with one AED being placed in a location identified
by the State Board and one being placed in the school athletic facility
or area.
b. Implementation of an appropriate training course for public school
personnel in the use of AEDs, including the role of cardiopulmonary
resuscitation (CPR) and first aid.
c. Proper maintenance and testing of the AEDs.
d. Coordination with appropriate licensed professionals in the oversight
of training on the AEDs.
e. Coordination with local emergency medical systems regarding the
placement of AEDs in school buildings."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(70) Use of Automatic External Defibrillators (AEDs). – Local boards of education
shall develop policies for the installation, maintenance, and use of AEDs in
accordance with rules developed by the State Board of Education pursuant to
G.S. 115C-12(50)."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-150.12C is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(37) Use of automatic external defibrillators (AEDs). – The board of trustees shall
develop policies for the installation, maintenance, and use of AEDs in
accordance with rules developed by the State Board of Education pursuant to
G.S. 115C-12(50)."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 115C-218.75 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
*S89-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(p) Use of Automatic External Defibrillators (AEDs). – Charter schools shall develop
policies for the installation, maintenance, and use of AEDs in accordance with rules developed
by the State Board of Education pursuant to G.S. 115C-12(50)."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 115C-238.66 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(23) Use of automatic external defibrillators (AEDs). – Regional schools shall
develop policies for the installation, maintenance, and use of AEDs in
accordance with rules developed by the State Board of Education pursuant to
G.S. 115C-12(50)."
SECTION 2.(e) G.S. 116-11 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(15) The Board of Governors shall develop policies for all public secondary
schools under the Board's jurisdiction for the installation, maintenance, and
use of automatic external defibrillators (AEDs) in accordance with rules
developed by the State Board of Education pursuant to G.S. 115C-12(50)."
SECTION 2.(f) G.S. 115C-562.5(a) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(7a) For any school facility in which students attend in-person classes, install and
maintain two automatic external defibrillators (AEDs) and provide training to
school staff on the proper use of AEDs. Schools are encouraged but not
required to use rules issued by the State Board of Education pursuant to
G.S. 115C-12(50) to guide the school's policy on the installation location of
the AEDs and staff training."
SECTION 3.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of nine million two hundred thousand dollars ($9,200,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction to the governing body of each public school unit in the amount of four thousand
dollars ($4,000) per school in the public school unit for the purchase and installation of two AEDs
per school and training personnel on the proper use of the AEDs as required by this act.
SECTION 3.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of two million eight hundred thousand
dollars ($2,800,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to the
State Education Assistance Authority to be distributed to all nonpublic schools that accept
eligible students receiving scholarship grants in the amount of four thousand dollars ($4,000) per
school for the purchase and installation of two AEDs per school and training personnel on the
proper use of AEDs as required by this act.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 89-First Edition